District of Columbia statutes.
1-735

Reporting of participants’ benefit rights.

(a)

The Board shall furnish to any participant or beneficiary who so requests in writing a statement indicating, on the basis of the latest available information:

(1)

The total benefits accrued; and

(2)

The nonforfeitable retirement benefits, if any, which have accrued, or the earliest date on which benefits will become nonforfeitable.

(b)

A participant or beneficiary is not entitled to receive more than 1 report under subsection (a) of this section during any 12-month period.

Nov. 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 866, Pub. L. 96-122, § 165
1973 Ed., § 1-1835.
1981 Ed., § 1-735.
This section is referenced in § 1-736 and § 1-739.